Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
CHAPTER 13 International Transfer of Prisoners

42-13-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “International Transfer of Prisoners Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

42-13-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 669, § 1.

42-13-2.
Compliance with treaty by Governor or designee.

When a treaty is in effect between the United States and a foreign country providing for the transfer of convicted criminal offenders to those foreign countries of which such offenders are citizens or nationals, the Governor or the Governor’s designee is authorized, subject to the terms of the treaty, to act on behalf of the State of Georgia and to consent to the transfer of such convicted criminal offenders. The Governor or his or her designee is authorized to develop policies, procedures, and processes to implement the provisions of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-13-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 669, § 1.